Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF484.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2567YH (1) 91 ss/ns H.F. 484 Section 1. Section 43.4, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 1 following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 6. a. This section does not require a 3 political party to select a nominee for president at a caucus 4 as described in this section. 5 b. In lieu of selecting a nominee for president at a caucus 6 as described in this section, the chairperson of the state 7 central committee of a political party may request that the 8 state commissioner of elections conduct a primary election 9 consistent with the provisions of chapter 49 and this chapter 10 for the selection of a nominee for president. An election held 11 pursuant to this subsection shall be held at least four days 12 earlier than the scheduled date for any meeting, caucus, or 13 primary which constitutes the first determining stage of the 14 presidential nominating process in any other state, territory, 15 or any other group which has the authority to select delegates 16 in the presidential nomination. 17 c. The candidates for election as a nominee for president 18 at an election held pursuant to this subsection shall submit 19 nomination papers as described in this chapter and section 20 45.1, subsection 1, to the state commissioner of elections. 21 d. The state commissioner of elections shall adopt rules 22 pursuant to chapter 17A for the implementation of this 23 subsection. 24